North Carolina statutes. Chapter 93A. Real Estate License Law.
Article 4. Timeshares.

§ 93A-39.
Title.

This Article shall be known and may be cited as the “North Carolina Timeshare Act.”

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, rewrote the Article 4 heading, which formerly read “Time Shares.”

Session Laws
2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws
2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, substituted “Timeshare Act” for “Time Share Act” at the end. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

For comment, “North Carolina’s Time Share Act: Guidelines for Those Who Buy and Sell Time,” see 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 931 (1984).

§ 93A-40.
Registration required of timeshare programs; real estate license required.

Unless exempt under this Article, it shall be unlawful for any person in this State to engage or assume to engage in the business of a timeshare salesperson without first obtaining a real estate broker license issued by the North Carolina Real Estate Commission under the provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter unless the timeshare salesperson (i) meets the requirement for exemption set forth in G.S. 93A-2(c)(1) or (ii) is an employee of the registered timeshare developer whose income is reported on IRS Form W-2 of the registered timeshare’s developer. It shall be unlawful for a timeshare developer to sell or offer to sell a timeshare required to be registered in this State pursuant to this Article without first obtaining a certificate of registration issued by the North Carolina Real Estate Commission under the provisions of this Article.

A person responsible as general partner, corporate officer, joint venture, or sole proprietor who intentionally acts as a timeshare developer, allowing the offering of sale or the sale of timeshares to a purchaser, without first obtaining registration of the timeshare project under this Article shall be guilty of a Class I felony.

The provisions of this Article shall not apply to the following:

Any arrangement, plan, scheme, or method, including a timeshare program, wherein the contractually specified maximum total financial obligation on the owner’s part is three thousand dollars ($3,000) or less during the entire term of the plan.

Any arrangement, plan, scheme, or method, including a timeshare program, if the initial term and any renewal term are each for a period of five years or less, regardless of the owner’s contractually specified maximum total financial obligation, if any; provided, however, that (i) the period of any optional renewal term which the owner, in the owner’s sole discretion, may affirmatively elect to exercise, whether or not for additional consideration, shall not be included, and (ii) the period of any automatic renewals shall be included unless an owner has the right to terminate the membership at any time and receive a pro rata refund or the owner receives a notice no less than 30 days and no more than 60 days prior to any renewal term informing the owner of the right to terminate at any time prior to the date of automatic renewal.

The offering or sale, in another jurisdiction, of a timeshare program containing timeshare units located in this State; provided, however, that the timeshare program has been registered with the Commission.

The offering or sale, in this State, of a timeshare program containing only timeshare units located in another jurisdiction or jurisdictions.

The offering or sale of no more than seven timeshares within a five-year period by a consumer timeshare reseller who has acquired the timeshares for their own use and occupancy and who later offers it for resale, provided that the owner complies with the provisions of

G.S. 93A-67

.

The offering or sale by a managing entity, not otherwise a developer, or a third party engaged by the managing entity, of 50 or fewer timeshares in the timeshare program which it manages in a given calendar year to purchasers who are not existing owners of that timeshare program, provided that the managing entity complies with the provisions of

G.S. 93A-67

.

The conveyance, assignment, or transfer of more than seven timeshares to a purchaser who subsequently conveys, assigns, or transfers all acquired timeshares to a single purchaser in a single transaction, which transaction may occur in stages.

A purchaser’s acquisition, or the right to acquire, more than seven timeshare interests from an owner in connection with a loan, securitization, conduit, or similar financing arrangement transaction and who subsequently arranges for all or a portion of the timeshares to be offered by a developer in the ordinary course of business on its own behalf or on behalf of the purchaser.

The offering of an accommodation, product, service, discount, or other benefit which is incidental to the timeshare program and which is not necessary for any accommodation of the timeshare program to be available for use by an owner in a manner consistent in all material respects with the manner portrayed by any promotional material, advertising, or public offering statement.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 1987, c. 516, s. 16; 2000-140, s. 19(b); 2005-395, s. 19; 2019-195, s. 4; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws
2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-395, s. 19, effective April 1, 2006, in subsection (a), substituted “It shall” for “From and after July 1, 1984, it shall” and deleted “or salesperson” following “broker.”

Session Laws 2019-195, s. 4, effective August 9, 2019, in subsection (a), rewrote the first sentence and added the last sentence.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, substituted “timeshare programs” for “time share projects” in the section heading; rewrote subsection (a); in subsection (b), substituted “joint venture, or sole proprietor who intentionally acts as a timeshare developer, allowing the offering of sale or the sale of timeshares to a purchaser, without first obtaining registration of the timeshare project” for “joint venturer or sole proprietor who intentionally acts as a time share developer, allowing the offering of sale or the sale of time shares to a purchaser, without first obtaining registration of the time share project”; and added subsection (c). For applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-41.
Definitions.

When used in this Article, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:

Assessment. — The share of funds required for the payment of common expenses which is assessed from time to time against each owner by the managing entity.

Board. — The board of directors of a timeshare owners’ association.

Closing or close. — One of the following:

For the sale and purchase of a timeshare estate, conveyance of the legal or beneficial title to the timeshare estate as evidenced by the delivery of a timeshare instrument for conveyance of legal title or beneficial title to the purchaser or to the clerk of superior court in the county where the timeshare estate is located for recording.

For the sale and purchase of a timeshare use, the final execution and delivery by all parties of the last document necessary for vesting in the purchaser the full rights available under the timeshare program.

Commission. — The North Carolina Real Estate Commission.

Common expense. — All of the following:

Those expenses, fees, or taxes properly incurred for the maintenance, operation, and repair of the timeshare units or facilities, or both, constituting the timeshare program.

Any other expenses, fees, or taxes designated as common expenses in a timeshare declaration.

Conspicuous type. — A print type that is separated on all sides from other type and print and that is either (i) print type in upper- and lowercase letters two point sizes larger than the largest non-conspicuous type, exclusive of headings, on the page on which it appears, but not less than 10-point type, or (ii) where the use of 10-point type would be impractical or impossible, a different style of type or print that is conspicuous under the circumstances.

Consumer resale timeshares. — One of the following:

A timeshare owned by an owner.

One or more reserved occupancy rights relating to a timeshare owned by an owner.

One or more reserved occupancy rights relating to, or arranged through, an exchange program in which an owner is a member.

Consumer timeshare reseller. — An owner who acquires a timeshare for their own use and occupancy and later offers the timeshare or the occupancy rights associated with the timeshare for resale or rental, or who contracts with a transfer service provider.

Developer. — Any person or entity which (i) creates a timeshare, timeshare project, or timeshare program, (ii) purchases a timeshare for purpose of resale, or (iii) is engaged in the business of selling timeshares it owns or controls and shall include any person or entity who controls, is controlled by, or is in common control with the developer which is engaged in creating or selling timeshares for the developer.

Electronic. — Relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

Enrolled. — Membership in an exchange program.

Exchange company. — Any person operating an exchange program.

Exchange program. — Any method, arrangement, or procedure for the voluntary exchange of the right to use and occupy timeshare units among owners, even if enrollment is not voluntary.

Foreclosing party. — A trustee, mortgagee, managing entity, or their authorized agent who has the designated authority to pursue a nonjudicial foreclosure proceeding pursuant to

G.S. 93A-62

.

Independent escrow agent. — A licensed attorney located in this State, or a federally insured depository institution or licensed title insurance underwriter or agency, lawfully doing business in this State, which agrees to make its records of the account available for inspection by the Commission’s representative; provided, however, that (i) the independent escrow agent is not a relative or an employee of the developer or managing entity, or of any officer, director, affiliate, or subsidiary thereof, (ii) there is no financial relationship, other than the payment of fiduciary fees, between the independent escrow agent and the developer or managing entity, or any officer, director, affiliate, or subsidiary thereof, and (iii) compensation paid by the developer to an independent escrow agent is not paid from funds in the escrow account unless and until the developer is otherwise entitled to receive the disbursement of such funds from the escrow account in accordance with this Article. A person shall not be disqualified to serve as an independent escrow agent solely because of any of the following:

A nonemployee, attorney-client relationship exists between the developer or managing entity and the independent escrow agent or any officer, director, affiliate, or subsidiary thereof.

The independent escrow agent provides the developer or managing entity with routine banking services which do not include construction or receivables financing or any other lending activities.

The independent escrow agent performs closings for the developer or issues owner’s or lender’s title insurance commitments or policies in connection with such closings.

The independent escrow agent is a licensed attorney or a licensed title insurance underwriter or agency and performs timeshare transfer services.

Interest holder. — A developer, a mortgagee, judgment creditor, or other lienor, or any other person having an interest in or lien or encumbrance against the real property or personal property comprising or underlying the timeshare property, including the timeshares and the timeshare units, but excluding the timeshare declaration and any encumbrance placed against an owner’s timeshare securing the owner’s payment of purchase money financing for the purchase. With respect to a multisite timeshare program which contains timeshare units that are also part of an underlying timeshare program or condominium or other property regime, the term does not include a developer, a mortgagee, judgment creditor, or other lienor, or any other person having an interest in or lien or encumbrance against a timeshare in an underlying timeshare program or against a timeshare unit or other accommodation in an underlying condominium or property regime, except as to any timeshare, timeshare unit, or other accommodation that is specifically subject to, or otherwise dedicated to, the multisite timeshare program.

Lead dealer. — A person who sells or otherwise provides a resale service provider or any other person with personal contact information for five or more purchasers or owners. If a lead dealer is not a natural person, the term shall also include the natural person providing personal contact information to a resale service provider or other person on behalf of the lead dealer entity. The term does not include developers, managing entities, or exchange companies to the extent they provide others with personal contact information about purchasers or owners of timeshares in their own timeshare programs or members of their own exchange programs. The term does not include persons providing personal contact information that is not designed specifically or primarily to identify owners of timeshares even though the information provided may include five or more purchasers or owners.

Managing entity. — Any developer, timeshare owners’ association, or third-party management firm that has the duties, responsibilities, and obligations of managing a timeshare project or timeshare program.

Multisite timeshare program. — A timeshare program under which an owner obtains, by any means, a recurring right to reserve, use, or occupy timeshare units of more than one timeshare project through the mandatory use of a reservation system in competition with other owners in the same timeshare program.

One-to-one use night to use right ratio. — The ratio of the number of owners eligible to use the timeshare units on a given night to the number of timeshare units available for use within the timeshare program on that night, such that the total number of owners eligible to use the timeshare units during a given calendar year never exceeds the total number of timeshare units available for use in the timeshare program during that year. For purposes of the calculation under this definition, each owner must be counted at least once, and no individual timeshare units may be counted more than 365 times per calendar year or more than 366 times per leap year. An owner who is delinquent in the payment of timeshare program assessments shall continue to be considered eligible to use the timeshare units of the timeshare program for purposes of calculating the one-to-one use night to use right ratio.

Owner. — Any person, other than a developer, who has acquired a timeshare.

Person. — One or more natural persons, corporations, partnerships, associations, trusts, other entities, or any combination thereof.

Personal contact information. — Any information that can be used to contact a purchaser or an owner, including, but not limited to, the purchaser’s or owner’s name, address, telephone number, and email address.

Program broker. — A natural person licensed as a real estate broker and designated by the developer to supervise brokers at the timeshare program.

Purchaser. — Any person, other than a developer, who is advertised or solicited to acquire a timeshare, offered a timeshare, or enters into a timeshare instrument to acquire a timeshare.

Regulated party. — Any developer, exchange company, managing entity, timeshare owners’ association, timeshare owners’ association director or officer, third-party management firm, independent escrow agent, lead dealer, resale broker, resale service provider, resale advertiser, timeshare transfer provider, timeshare registrar, any other person having duties or obligations pursuant to this Article, and any of their respective assignees or agents.

Resale advertiser. — Any person who offers, personally or through an agent, resale advertising services to consumer timeshare resellers for compensation or other valuable consideration, regardless of whether the offer is made in person, by mail, by telephone, through the internet, or by any other medium of communication. The term does not include any of the following:

A resale broker to the extent that resale advertising services are offered in connection with timeshare resale brokerage services and no fee for the resale advertising service is collected in advance.

A developer or managing entity to the extent that either of them offers resale advertising services to owners of timeshares in their own timeshare programs.

A newspaper, periodical, or website owner, operator, or publisher, unless the newspaper, periodical, or website owner, operator, or publisher derives more than ten percent (10%) of its gross revenue from providing resale advertising services.

Resale advertising service. — The provision of any good or service relating to advertising or promoting the resale or rental of a consumer resale timeshare located or offered within this State, including any offer to advertise or promote the sale or purchase of any such interest.

Resale broker. — Any person who is issued a broker’s license by the North Carolina Real Estate Commission under the provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter and who offers or provides resale brokerage services to consumer timeshare resellers for compensation or other valuable consideration, regardless of whether the offer is made in person, by mail, by telephone, through the internet, or by any other medium of communication. The term includes any agent or employee of a resale broker.

Resale brokerage services. — With respect to a consumer resale timeshare located or offered within this State, any activity that directly or indirectly consists of any of the activities regulated under

G.S. 93A-1

.

Resale service provider. — Any resale advertiser, or other person or entity, including any agent or employee of that person or entity, who offers resale brokerage or resale advertising services to consumer timeshare resellers. The term does not include (i) developers or managing entities to the extent they offer resale brokerage or resale advertising services to owners of timeshares in their own timeshare programs or (ii) resale brokers to the extent that resale advertising services are offered in connection with resale brokerage services and no fee for the advertising service is collected in advance.

Reservation system. — The method, arrangement, procedure, rules, and regulations by which an owner reserves the use and occupancy of a timeshare unit for one or more timeshare periods.

Reservation system operator. — The person who has the responsibility for operating any reservation system for the timeshare program. Unless the timeshare declaration provides otherwise, the operator of the reservation system is the managing entity of a timeshare program. The reservation system operator may be a third-party entity that has contracted with the developer or managing entity to provide the reservation system for the timeshare program, provided that the third party shall be deemed a managing entity as to the operation of the reservation system for purposes of this Article.

Timeshare. – A timeshare estate or timeshare use.

Timeshare declaration. — One or more documents, by whatever name denominated, establishing, creating, or governing the operation of a timeshare program.

Timeshare estate. — The right to occupy a timeshare unit coupled with ownership of any of the following real property interests:

A freehold estate or an estate for years with a future interest in property.

An ownership interest in a condominium unit.

A direct or indirect beneficial interest in a trust, provided that both of the following conditions are met:

The timeshare instrument contains a provision declaring that such interests are real property interests.

The trust does not contain any timeshares created in personal property.

Timeshare instrument. — An instrument transferring a timeshare or any interest, legal or beneficial, in a timeshare to a purchaser, including a contract, installment contract, lease, deed, or other instrument.

Timeshare owners’ association. — An association made up of all owners of timeshares in a timeshare program, including developers.

Timeshare period. — The period or periods of time when an owner is afforded the opportunity to use a timeshare unit under the terms of the timeshare program.

Timeshare program. — Any arrangement, plan, program, scheme, or similar device, other than an exchange program, whether by membership, agreement, tenancy in common, sale, lease, deed, rental agreement, license, or right-to-use agreement, or by any other means whereby an owner receives the right to use timeshare units for a period of time less than a full year during any given year, but not necessarily for consecutive years.

Timeshare project. — A specific geographic site where all or a portion of the timeshare units of a timeshare program are located. If phased development is permitted under applicable law, separate phases operated as a single development located at a specific geographic site under common management may be deemed a single timeshare project by the developer.

Timeshare property. — The property included in or subject to a timeshare program, including timeshares in an underlying timeshare program, one or more timeshare units, any amenities, any other property, and appurtenant property or rights.

Timeshare registrar. — A natural person who is designated by the developer to record or cause timeshare instruments and lien releases to be recorded and to fulfill the other duties imposed by this Article.

Timeshare salesperson. — A person who sells or offers to sell on behalf of a developer a timeshare to a purchaser.

Timeshare transfer services. — Any service offered or provided in this State, or offered or provided anywhere in connection with a timeshare program containing timeshare units or a timeshare property located in this State, that provides assistance in the resale, transfer, relinquishment, or other disposition of a consumer timeshare reseller’s timeshare, including a reconveyance or other transfer to a developer or managing entity, whether referred to as timeshare exit, timeshare cancellation, timeshare relief, or any similar phrase. The term does not include resale advertising services.

Timeshare transfer services agreement. — A contract or other agreement between a transfer service provider and a consumer timeshare reseller in which the transfer service provider agrees to provide such services.

Timeshare unit. — The real property or real property improvement in a project which is divided into timeshares and designated for separate occupancy and use.

Timeshare use. — The right to occupy a timeshare unit that is not coupled with ownership of a real property interest.

Transfer service provider. — Any person, including any agent, representative, subsidiary, successor, or employee of that person or entity, unless otherwise exempt, who offers or uses telemarketing, direct mail, email, or any other means of communication in connection with the offering of timeshare transfer services.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 1985, c. 578, s. 1; 1999-229, ss. 13, 14; 2000-140, s. 19(b); 2005-395, s. 20; 2011-217, s. 19; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-395, s. 20, effective April 1, 2006, deleted “and salespersons” following “brokers” in subdivision (7a).

Session Laws 2011-217, s. 19, effective January 1, 2012, in subdivision (9), substituted “or a specified portion of a time share project. ‘Time share’ shall also include a vacation license” for “or a specified portion thereof, including, but not limited to, a vacation license,” inserted “a time share unit or units for a period of time,” and added “even if on a competitive basis with other purchasers.”

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-42.
Timeshare estates deemed real estate; timeshare uses.

A timeshare estate is deemed to be an interest in real estate and shall be governed by the law of this State relating to real estate.

An owner of a timeshare located in the State may, in accordance with

G.S. 47-18

, register the timeshare instrument by which the owner acquired the interest and upon such registration shall be entitled to the protection provided by Chapter 47 of the General Statutes for the recordation of other real property instruments. A timeshare instrument transferring or encumbering a timeshare estate shall not be rejected for recordation because of the nature or duration of that estate, provided all other requirements necessary to make an instrument recordable are complied with. An instrument concerning a timeshare use shall not be recorded in the office of the register of deeds in any county in this State.

Unless the timeshare instrument provides otherwise, the developer shall close on the sale of a timeshare estate and record or cause to be recorded a timeshare instrument for timeshare estates located in this State no later than 180 days following the execution of the contract of sale by the purchaser, provided that all payments made by the purchaser have been placed by the developer with an independent escrow agent in accordance with

G.S. 93A-45

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021.

In no event shall the developer be required to close and record a timeshare instrument if the purchaser is in default of the purchaser’s obligations under the contract of sale.

Recordation under the provisions of this section of the timeshare instrument shall constitute delivery of that instrument from the developer to the purchaser.

A timeshare use is not an interest in real property and shall be governed by the laws of this State relating to personal property. For each transfer of the legal title to a timeshare use by a developer, the developer shall deliver an instrument evidencing such transfer to the purchaser at closing. Unless the timeshare instrument provides otherwise, the developer shall close on the sale of a timeshare use no later than 180 days following the execution of the contract of sale by the purchaser, provided that all payments made by the purchaser shall be placed by the developer with an independent escrow agent in accordance with

G.S. 93A-45

. In no event shall the developer be required to close on the sale of a timeshare use if the purchaser is in default of the purchaser’s obligations under the contract of sale.

A developer may not sell or close on the sale of any timeshare that would cause the total number of timeshares available for use in the timeshare program to exceed the one-to-one use night to use right ratio.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 1985, c. 578, ss. 2, 3; 1989, c. 302; 2001-487, s. 23(i); 2011-217, s. 20; 2017-25, s. 1(k); 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-217, s. 20 effective January 1, 2012, in subsection (a), inserted “which in whole or in part burdens or pertains to real property in this State”; and in subsection (b), inserted “which burdens or pertains to real property located in the State” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

Session Laws 2017-25, s. 1(k), effective June 2, 2017, substituted “federally insured depository institution or a trust institution authorized to do business in this State” for “bank or savings and loan association located in this State” in the first sentence of subsection (d).

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 93A-42.1.
Construction and validity of declarations adopted prior to the Timeshare Act.

All provisions contained in timeshare declarations adopted and recorded at the appropriate register of deeds office prior to July 1, 1984, are severable.

The rule against perpetuities may not be applied to defeat any provision of timeshare declarations or bylaws adopted and recorded at the appropriate register of deeds office prior to July 1, 1984.

Except as otherwise provided in the timeshare declaration, the board of directors of a timeshare project may, by an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the board, amend a provision within the timeshare declaration, provided that the provision to be changed meets all of the following criteria:

The provision was adopted as part of the original timeshare declaration recorded prior to July 1, 1984.

The provision either converts or provides a mechanism to convert ownership of timeshare units to tenancy in common.

Title or interest in a timeshare project or unit is not rendered unmarketable or otherwise affected by reason of an insubstantial failure of the timeshare declaration to comply with this section. Whether a substantial failure to comply with this section impairs marketability shall be determined by the laws of this State relating to marketability.

This section shall not otherwise impair the ability of the individual timeshare owner’s right under the timeshare declaration, bylaws, or the laws of this State to vote to terminate the timeshare project or to amend the declaration to provide for the termination of the timeshare project and interests.

History.

2014-99, s. 1; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

§ 93A-43.
Partition.

When a timeshare is owned by two or more persons as tenants in common or as joint tenants, either may seek a partition by sale of that interest under Chapter 46A of the General Statutes, but no owner of a timeshare shall maintain a proceeding for partition, whether by actual partition or by partition sale, of the timeshare unit, timeshare project, or timeshare program in which the timeshare is held.

History.

1983, c. 814, s. 1; 2020-23, s. 15; 2021-163, s. 1(c); 2021-192, s. 5(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2021-192, s. 5(a), provides, in part: “Section 1(c) of this act does not apply to timeshare transfer services or to transfer service providers prior to July 1, 2022.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2020-23, s. 15, effective October 1, 2020, added “under Chapter 46A of the General Statutes,” substituted “a proceeding for partition, whether by actual partition or by partition sale” for “an action for partition by sale or in kind”; and made a minor punctuation change and stylistic changes.

Session Laws 2021-163, s. 1(c), effective October 6, 2021, substituted “timeshare” for “time share” in three places, “owner” for “purchaser” in the middle, and “timeshare unit, timeshare project or timeshare program” for “unit” toward the end. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).